Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.
THERAPY]

[§323-51] Animal therapy. Animals of
the kind commonly kept as household pets may be brought into long term health
care facilities for the purpose of visiting patients therein. The institution
shall determine whether an animal is suitable for visitation, the location
where the visit may take place, and the policies governing the visit. At the
discretion of the institution, the animal owner may be required to produce
written documentation from a veterinarian attesting to the animal's good
health, before visitation is permitted. [L 1985, c 290, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next